Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.077

Breast cancer awareness license plates.

"Breast cancer awareness license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing breast cancer awareness.

[ 2014 c 77 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 77: See note following RCW 46.18.200.